th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > รายการอาหาร > เครื่องปรุงรสและซอส: ซอสบาร์บีคิว; ซอสค็อกเทล; เครื่องแกงและซอสข้นสำหรับทำอาหาร; เครื่องแกง; ท็อปปิ้งขนม; น้ำปลา; น้ำเกรวี่; น้ำผึ้ง; ซอสฮอสแรดิช; ซอสพริก; ซอสมะเขือเทศ; ซอสหมักเนื้อสัตว์และปิ้งย่าง; มายองเนส; มิโสะ; มัสตาร์ด; มะกอกและเคเปอร์; ซอสพาสต้า; ผักและผลไม้ดอง; ซอสพิซซ่า; เครื่องปรุงรสและชัทนีย์; น้ำสลัด; น้ำจิ้มสะเต๊ะ; ซอสถั่วเหลือง; ซอสเปรี้ยวหวาน; น้ำเชื่อม; ทาฮีนี; ซอสทาร์ทาร์; ไวท์ครีมและซอสครีม; ซอสจากประเทศอังกฤษ
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Matvarer > Tilbehør og sauser: Grillsauser; Cocktailsaus; Matlagingspastaer og -pureer; Karrisaus; Desserttoppinger; Fiskesaus; Brun saus; Honning; Saus med pepperrot; Sterk saus; Ketchup; Marinader og grillsauser; Majones; Miso; Sennep; Oliven og kapers; Pastasaus; Syltet frukt og grønnsaker; Pizzasaus; Relish og chutney; Salatdressing; Sataysaus; Soyasaus; Søte og sure sauser; Sirup; Tahini; Tartarsaus; Hvite og kremsauser; Worchestershiresaus
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Yiyecek Çeşitleri > Çeşniler ve Soslar: Barbekü sosları; Kokteyl Sos; Yemeklik ezme ve püreler; Körili Sos; Tatlı Sosları; Balık Sosu; Et Suyu; Bal; Yaban Turbu Sosu; Acılı Sos; Ketçap; Marinat ve Izgara Sosları; Mayonez; Miso; Hardal; Zeytinler ve Kapariler; Makarna Sosu; Meyve ve Sebze Turşusu; Pizza Sosu; Çeşni ve Hint Turşusu; Salata Sosu; Satay Sos; Soya Sosu; Tatlı ve Acı Soslar; Şurup; Tahin; Tatar Sosu; Beyaz Sos ve Kremalı Soslar; Worcestershire Sosu
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Пищевые продукты > Приправы, добавки и соусы: Соусы барбекю; Коктейльный соус; Кулинарные пасты и пюре; Соус карри; Топинги для десертов; Соус для рыбы; Подливки; Мед; Соус с хреном; Острый соус; Кетчуп; Маринады и соусы для гриля; Майонез; Мисо; Горчица; Оливки и каперсы; Соус для пасты; Маринованные фрукты и овощи; Соус для пиццы; Релиш и чатни; Заправки для салатов; Арахисовый соус; Соевый соус; Кисло-сладкий соус; Сиропы; Кунжутная паста (тахини); Соус тартар; Белые и сливочные соусы; Вустерский соус
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Ruokatuotteet > Maustekastikkeet ja kastikkeet: BBQ-kastikkeet; Cocktail-kastike; Ruoanlaittotahnat ja -soseet; Currykastike; Jälkiruokakastikkeet; Kalakastike; Paistinkastike; Hunaja; Piparjuurikastike; Chilikastike; Ketsuppi; Marinadit ja grillauskastikkeet; Majoneesi; Miso; Sinappi; Oliivit ja kaprikset; Pastakastike; Säilötyt hedelmät ja kasvikset; Pizzakastike; Relissi ja chutney; Salaatinkastike; Satay-kastike; Soijakastike; Hapanimeläkastikkeet; Siirappi; Tahini; Tartarkastike; Valko- ja kermakastikkeet; Worcestershire-kastike
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Alimentos > Condimentos e molhos: Molhos barbecue; Molho coquetel; Pastas e purês culinários; Molho curry; Coberturas de sobremesa; Molho de peixe; Molho de carne; Mel; Molho de raiz-forte; Molho de pimenta; Ketchup; Escabeches e molhos para grelhar; Maionese; Missô; Mostarda; Azeitonas e alcaparras; Molhos para massas; Frutas e vegetais em conserva; Molho de pizza; Molhos relish e chutney; Molhos para saladas; Molho satay; Molho de soja; Molhos agridoces; Xarope; Taine; Molho tártaro; Molhos brancos e béchamel; Molho inglês
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 식품 > 양념/소스: 바비큐 소스; 칵테일 소스; 요리용 페이스트 및 퓌레; 카레 소스; 디저트 토핑; 피시 소스; 그레이비; 꿀; 호스래디시 소스; 핫소스; 케첩; 양념장/구이용 소스; 마요네즈; 미소; 머스터드; 올리브/케이퍼; 파스타 소스; 과일/야채 피클; 피자 소스; 렐리시/처트니; 샐러드 드레싱; 사테이 소스; 간장; 새콤달콤한 소스; 시럽; 타히니; 타르타르 소스; 화이트/크림 소스; 우스터 소스
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Artigos alimentares > Condimentos e molhos: Molhos barbecue; Molho de cocktail; Pastas e purés para cozinhar; Molho de caril; Cobertura de sobremesa; Molho para peixe; Molhos; Mel; Molho de rábano; Molho picante; Ketchup; Marinadas e molhos para grelhados; Maionese; Miso; Mostarda; Azeitonas e alcaparras; Molho para massa; Fruta e vegetais em conserva; Molho de piza; Relish e chutney; Coberturas para salada; Molho Satay; Molho de soja; Molhos agridoces; Xarope; Tahini; Molho tártaro; Molhos branco e cremes; Molho Worcestershire
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Maisto prekės > Pagardai ir padažai: Barbekiu padažai; Kokteilinis padažas; Virimo pastos ir tyrės; Kario padažas; Desertų pabarstukai; Žuvies padažas; Mėsos padažas; Medus; Krienų padažas; Aštrus padažas; Kečupas; Marinatai ir kepimo ant grotelių padažai; Majonezas; Miso; Garstyčios; Alyvuogės ir kaparėliai; Makaronų padažas; Marinuoti vaisiai ir daržovės; Picos padažas; Relišas ir čatnis; Salotų padažas; Satay padažas; Sojų padažas; Saldžiarūgščiai padažai; Sirupas; Tahinis; Totoriškas padažas; Baltieji ir grietinėlės padažai; Vorčesterio padažas
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Food Items > Condiments & Sauces: Barbecue Sauces; Cocktail Sauce; Cooking Pastes & Purees; Curry Sauce; Dessert Toppings; Fish Sauce; Gravy; Honey; Horseradish Sauce; Hot Sauce; Ketchup; Marinades & Grilling Sauces; Mayonnaise; Miso; Mustard; Olives & Capers; Pasta Sauce; Pickled Fruits & Vegetables; Pizza Sauce; Relish & Chutney; Salad Dressing; Satay Sauce; Soy Sauce; Sweet and Sour Sauces; Syrup; Tahini; Tartar Sauce; White & Cream Sauces; Worcestershire Sauce
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Voedselitems > Specerijen en sauzen: Barbecuesauzen; Cocktailsaus; Kookpasta's en -purees; Currysaus; Dessertsauzen; Vissaus; Jus; Honing; Mierikswortelsaus; Hot sauce; Ketchup; Marinades en grillsauzen; Mayonaise; Miso; Mosterd; Olijven en kappertjes; Pastasauzen; Ingelegde vruchten en groenten; Pizzasaus; Relish en chutney; Saladedressings; Satésaus; Sojasaus; Zoete en zure sauzen; Siroop; Tahin; Tartaarsaus; Witte en roomsauzen; Worcestersaus
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Élelmiszertételek > Fűszerek és szószok: Barbecue szószok; Koktélszósz; Főzőpaszták és pürék; Curry-szósz; Desszertöntetek; Halszósz; Gravy; Méz; Tormaszósz; Forró szósz; Ketchup; Pácok és grillszószok; Majonéz; Miso; Mustár; Olajbogyó és kapribogyó; Tésztaszósz; Ecetes gyümölcsök és zöldségek; Pizzaszósz; Relish és csatni; Salátaöntet; Satay-szósz; Szójaszósz; Édes-savanyú szószok; Szirup; Tahini; Tatárszósz; Fehér és tejszínes szószok; Worcestershire-szósz
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse alimentare > Condimente și sosuri: Sosuri barbecue; Sos cocteil; Paste și piureuri pentru gătit; Sos de curry; Toppinguri pentru desert; Sos de pește; Sos pentru carne; Miere; Sos cu hrean; Sos iute; Ketchup; Marinade și sosuri pentru grătar; Maioneză; Miso; Muștar; Măsline și capere; Sos pentru paste; Fructe și legume murate; Sos pentru pizza; Condimente pe bază de murături și chutney; Dressing pentru salată; Sos Satay; Sos de soia; Sosuri dulci-acrișoare; Sirop; Tahini; Sos tartar; Sosuri albe și sosuri cu smântână; Sos Worcestershire
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Alimentos > Condimentos y salsas: Salsas barbacoa; Salsa rosa; Pastas y purés para cocinar; Salsa curry; Guarniciones para postres; Salsa de pescado; Salsa de asado; Miel; Salsa de rábano picante; Salsa picante; Ketchup; Adobos y salsas; Mahonesa; Miso; Mostaza; Alcaparras y aceitunas; Salsas para pasta; Frutas y hortalizas encurtidas; Salsa para pizza; Picadillos y chutney; Aliños para ensaladas; Salsa satay; Salsa de soja; Salsas dulces y agrias; Sirope; Tahina; Salsa tártara; Salsas blancas y cremosas; Salsa Worcestershire
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Potraviny > Přísady, ochucovadla a omáčky: Barbecue omáčky; Dresingy k mořským plodům; Pasty a pyré na vaření; Kari omáčka; Polevy na dezerty; Rybí omáčka; Masové omáčky; Med; Křenový dresing; Pálivá omáčka; Kečup; Marinády a grilovací omáčky; Majonéza; Miso; Hořčice; Olivy a kapary; Omáčka na těstoviny; Nakládané ovoce a zelenina; Rajčatový základ na pizzu; Čalamády a chutney; Salátový dresink; Omáčka satay; Sójová omáčka; Sladkokyselé omáčky; Sirupy; Tahini – sezamová pasta; Tatarská omáčka; Bešamelové a smetanové omáčky; Worcestrová omáčka
ja: 食品・飲料 > 食品 > 調味料・ソース: バーベキューソース; カクテルソース; クッキングペースト・ピューレ; カレーソース; 製菓用トッピング; 魚醤; グレービー; はちみつ; わさびソース; 唐辛子ソース; ケチャップ; マリネード、グリル ソース; マヨネーズ; 味噌; からし・マスタード; オリーブ・ケッパー; パスタソース; ピクルス（フルーツ、野菜）; ピザソース; 薬味、チャツネ; ドレッシング; サテーソース; しょうゆ; スイート サワー ソース; シロップ; ごまペースト; タルタルソース; ホワイト ソース、クリーム ソース; ウスターソース
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Είδη διατροφής > Καρυκεύματα & σάλτσες: Σάλτσες μπάρμπεκιου; Σάλτσα κοκτέιλ; Πάστες και πουρέδες μαγειρικής; Σάλτσα κάρι; Επικαλύψεις επιδορπίου; Σάλτσα ψαριού; Σάλτσα; Μέλι; Σάλτσα ραπανιού; Καυτερή σάλτσα; Κέτσαπ; Μαρινάδες & σάλτσες ψησίματος; Μαγιονέζα; Μίσο; Μουστάρδα; Ελιές & κάπαρη; Σάλτσα ζυμαρικών; Τουρσί φρούτων & λαχανικών; Σάλτσα πίτσας; Σάλτσα Relish & Chutney; Σάλτσες σαλάτας; Σάλτσα Satay; Σάλτσα σόγιας; Γλυκόξινες σάλτσες; Σιρόπι; Ταχίνι; Σάλτσα ταρτάρ; Λευκές & κρεμώδεις σάλτσες; Σάλτσα Worcestershire
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Prehrambeni izdelki > Dodatki jedem in omake: Omake za žar; Koktajl omaka; Paste in pireji za kuhanje; Kari omaka; Prelivi za sladice; Ribja omaka; Mesna omaka; Med; Hrenova omaka; Pikantna omaka; Kečap; Marinade in omake za žar; Majoneza; Miso; Gorčica; Olive in kapre; Omaka za testenine; Vloženo sadje in zelenjava; Omaka za pico; Začinjena priloga in čatni; Solatni preliv; Satay omaka; Sojina omaka; Sladke in kisle omake; Sirup; Tahini; Tatarska omaka; Bele in smetanove omake; Worcesterska omaka
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Potraviny > Ochucovadlá a omáčky: Grilovacie omáčky; Koktailová omáčka; Pasty a pyré na varenie; Kari omáčka; Dezertné polevy; Rybia omáčka; Omáčka k mäsu; Med; Chrenová omáčka; Pikantná omáčka; Kečup; Marinády a omáčky na grilovanie; Majonéza; Miso; Horčica; Olivy a kapary; Omáčka na cestoviny; Nakladané ovocie a zelenina; Omáčka na pizzu; Chuťovky a čatní; Šalátový dresing; Satay omáčka; Sójová omáčka; Sladké a kyslé omáčky; Sirup; Tahini; Tatárska omáčka; Biele a smotanové omáčky; Worcesterská omáčka
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Fødevarer > Krydderier og saucer: Barbecuesaucer; Skaldyrsdressing; Madlavningspastaer og -puréer; Karrysovs; Dessertpynt; Fiskesauce; Sovs; Honning; Peberrodsdressing; Chilisovs; Ketchup; Marinader og grillsaucer; Majonæse; Miso; Sennep; Oliven og kapers; Pastasauce; Syltede frugter og grøntsager; Pizzasauce; Relish og chutney; Salatdressing; Sataysauce; Sojasauce; Sursøde saucer; Sirup; Tahin; Tatarsauce; Hvide saucer og flødesaucer; Worcestershiresauce
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Alimenti > Condimenti e salse: Salse barbecue; Salsa cocktail; Paste e puree per cucinare; Salsa di curry; Guarnizioni per dessert; Salsa per pesce; Sughi; Miele; Salsa di rafano; Salsa piccante; Ketchup; Marinature e salse per griglia; Maionese; Miso; Senape; Olive e capperi; Condimenti per pasta; Frutta e verdura sottaceto; Salsa per pizza; Salse e chutney; Condimenti per insalata; Salsa satay; Salsa di soia; Salse agrodolci; Sciroppo; Tahina; Salsa tartara; Salse bianche e cremose; Salsa Worcester
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 食品 > 酱汁与调味品: 烧烤酱; 鸡尾酒酱; 烹饪酱膏和泥; 咖喱酱; 甜点装饰; 鱼露; 肉汁酱; 蜂蜜; 辣根酱; 辣酱; 番茄酱; 腌泡汁和烧烤酱; 蛋黄酱; 味噌; 芥末; 橄榄/酸豆; 意大利面酱; 腌制水果/蔬菜; 披萨酱; 开胃小菜/酸辣酱; 沙拉酱/沙拉调料; 沙嗲酱; 酱油; 甜味与酸味酱; 糖浆; 芝麻酱; 塔塔酱; 白酱/奶油酱; 辣酱油/伍斯特沙司
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 食品 > 調味料/醬料: 烤肉醬; 雞尾酒醬; 烹調醬與果泥; 咖哩醬; 甜點配料; 魚露; 肉汁; 蜂蜜; 辣根醬; 辣椒醬; 蕃茄醬; 醃醬/烤肉醬; 美乃滋; 味噌; 芥末醬; 橄欖和續隨子; 義大利麵醬; 醃漬蔬果; 披薩醬; 酸辣醬; 沙拉醬; 沙嗲醬; 醬油; 酸甜/糖醋醬料; 糖漿; 芝麻醬; 塔塔醬; 奶油白醬; 伍斯特醬
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Prehrambeni artikli > Začini i umaci: Umaci za roštilj; Koktel umak; Paste i pirei za kuhanje; Curry umak; Preljevi za deserte; Riblji umak; Umak; Med; Umak od hrena; Ljuti umak; Kečap; Marinade i umaci za roštiljanje; Majoneza; Miso; Senf; Masline i kapari; Umak za tjesteninu; Ukiseljeno voće i povrće; Umak za pizzu; Relish i chutney; Preljev za salatu; Satay umak; Soja umak; Slatko-kiseli umaci; Sirup; Tahini; Tartar umak; Bijeli i kremasti umaci; Worcestershire umak
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Aliments > Sauces et condiments: Sauces barbecue; Sauce cocktail; Pâtes et purées de cuisson; Sauce au curry; Décorations pour desserts; Sauce de poisson; Jus de viande; Miel; Sauce au raifort; Sauce piquante; Ketchup; Marinades et sauces pour barbecue; Mayonnaise; Miso; Moutarde; Olives et câpres; Sauces pour pâtes; Fruits et légumes marinés; Sauce pour pizza; Condiments et chutneys; Assaisonnements pour salades; Sauce satay; Sauce soja; Sauces aigres-douces; Sirop; Tahini; Sauce tartare; Sauces Béchamel; Sauce Worcestershire
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Hàng thực phẩm > Gia vị và nước sốt: Sốt BBQ; Sốt cocktail; Gia vị dạng sệt & nhuyễn; Nước sốt cà ri; Topping món tráng miệng; Nước mắm; Nước sốt từ thịt; Mật ong; Nước sốt cải ngựa; Tương ớt; Sốt cà chua; Nước sốt & sốt quay; Sốt mayonnaise; Tương miso; Mù tạt; Quả ô liu và quả bạch hoa; Nước xốt mỳ Ý; Rau quả đóng hộp; Nước sốt pizza; Gia vị và tương ớt; Nước sốt salad; Sốt đậu phộng; Xì dầu; Sốt chua ngọt; Si-rô; Bơ vừng tahini; Sốt tartar; Sốt kem trắng; Nước sốt worcestershire
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Żywność > Przyprawy i sosy: Sosy barbecue; Sos koktajlowy; Pasty do gotowania i purée; Sosy curry; Polewy do deserów; Sos do ryb; Sosy pieczeniowe; Miód; Sosy chrzanowe; Sosy ostre; Ketchupy; Marynaty i sosy do grillowania; Majonezy; Miso; Gorczyca; Oliwki i kapary; Sosy do makaronu; Marynowane owoce i warzywa; Sosy do pizzy; Sosy typu chutney; Dressingi do sałatek; Sos do sataya; Sos sojowy; Sosy słodko-kwaśne; Syrop; Tahini; Sos tatarski; Sosy białe; Sosy Worcestershire
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Lebensmittel > Würzmittel & Saucen: Barbecue-Saucen; Cocktailsaucen; Würzpasten & Pürees; Currysauce; Dessertsaucen; Fischsauce; Bratensoße; Honig; Meerrettichsaucen; Chilisauce; Ketchup; Marinaden und Grillsoßen; Mayonnaise; Miso; Senf; Oliven & Kapern; Pastasoßen; Eingelegtes Obst und Gemüse; Pizzasoße; Würzsoße und Chutney; Salatdressing; Sataysauce; Sojasauce; Süßsaure Soßen; Sirup; Tahini; Sauce tartare; Weiße Soßen und Rahmsoßen; Worcestershiresauce
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Livsmedel > Kryddor och såser: BBQ-såser; Cocktailsås; Matlagningspastor & puréer; Currysås; Efterrättsgarneringar; Fisksås; Skysås; Honung; Pepparrotssås; Chilisås; Ketchup; Marinader och grillsåser; Majonnäs; Miso; Senap; Oliver och kapris; Pastasås; Inlagd frukt och inlagda grönsaker; Pizzasås; Relish och chutney; Salladsdressing; Sataysås; Sojasås; Sötsura såser; Sirap; Tahini; Tartarsås; Vita såser och gräddsåser; Worcestershiresås
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Хранителни продукти > Добавки и сосове: Барбекю сосове; Коктейлен сос; Пасти и пюрета за готвене; Къри сос; Заливки за десерти; Рибен сос; Грейви сос; Мед; Сос от хрян; Лют сос; Кетчуп; Маринати и сосове за грил; Майонеза; Мисо; Горчица; Маслини и каперси; Сос за паста; Мариновани плодове и зеленчуци; Сос за пица; Релиш и чътни; Дресинг за салата; Сатай сос; Соев сос; Сладки и кисели сосове; Сироп; Тахан; Сос Тартар; Бели и сметанови сосове; Сос Уорчестър